Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3519
Technical submissions, defined.

Technical submissions means designs, drawings, specifications, studies, and other technical reports that:

(1) Constitute all or a part of a project; or

(2) Are prepared in conjunction with a project.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 67;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 16.